Illinois, session 104th, HB2539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 1-100 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/1-100 new)7    Sec. 1-100. Update terminology; forms and billing codes. 8No later than one year after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 10shall revise all Department forms and billings codes to remove 11all references to "mental retardation", "mentally retarded 12person", or any other similar term and replace it with 13"intellectual disability", "person with an intellectual 14disability", or a similar phrase that includes reference to 15intellectual disability as defined in Section 1-116 of the 16Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code. This change 17in terminology shall not be construed to invalidate any 18Department form or billing code that contains a reference to 19"mental retardation", "mentally retarded person", or any other 20similar term prior to the date upon which the Department 21implements the new terminology requirement under this Section.